Oklahoma, session 2026, SB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 197.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 197.2. It shall be unlawful to employ workers in any


industry or occupation within the State of Oklahoma this state under


conditions of labor detrimental to their health or morals and it


shall be unlawful to employ workers in any industry within the State


of Oklahoma this state at wages which are not adequate for their


maintenance. Except as otherwise provided in the Oklahoma Minimum


Wage Act, no employer within the State of Oklahoma employers of this


state shall pay any employee employees a wage of not less than


Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) an hour or the current federal minimum


wage, whichever is greater, for all hours worked.

Req. No. 831 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-831 CAD 12/17/2024 10:53:33 AM











































Req. No. 831 Page 2